Utah statutes.
17-27a-604.   Subdivision plat approval procedure -- Effect of not
complying.
(1)  A person may not submit a subdivision plat to the county recorder's
office for recording unless:
(a)  the plat has been approved by:
(i)  the land use authority of the county in whose unincorporated area the
land described in the plat is located; and
(ii)  other officers that the county designates in its ordinance; and
(b)  all approvals are entered in writing on the plat by designated officers.
(2)  A plat recorded without the signatures required under this section is
void.
(3)  A transfer of land pursuant to a void plat is voidable.
